Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1310.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 443.1(7)(iv) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended to read:Section 443.1. Medical Assistance Payments for Institutional Care.--The following medical assistance payments shall be made on behalf of eligible persons whose institutional care is prescribed by physicians:* * *(7) After June 30, 2007, payments to county and nonpublic nursing facilities enrolled in the medical assistance program as providers of nursing facility services shall be determined in 123456789101112131415161718 accordance with the methodologies for establishing payment rates for county and nonpublic nursing facilities specified in the department's regulations and the Commonwealth's approved Title XIX State Plan for nursing facility services in effect after June 30, 2007. The following shall apply:* * *(iv) Subject to Federal approval of such amendments as may be necessary to the Commonwealth's approved Title XIX State Plan, for each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2011, the department shall apply a revenue adjustment neutrality factor to county and nonpublic nursing facility payment rates so that the estimated Statewide day-weighted average payment rate in effect for that fiscal year is limited to the amount permitted by the funds appropriated by the General Appropriation Act for the fiscal year. The revenue adjustment neutrality factor shall remain in effect until the sooner of June 30, 2022, or the date on which a new rate-setting methodology for medical assistance nursing facility services which replaces the rate-setting methodology codified in 55 Pa. Code Chs. 1187 (relating to nursing facility services) and 1189 (relating to county nursing facility services) takes effect[.] as follows:(A) For each fiscal year, beginning on or after July 1, 2025, the revenue adjustment neutrality factor applied to nonpublic nursing facility rates shall be equal to or greater than 0.90.(B) For each fiscal year, beginning on or after July 1, 2025, the revenue adjustment neutrality factor applied to county nursing facility rates shall equal 1.00 plus the percentage rate of change used in determining the revenue adjustment factor applied to nonpublic nursing facility rates in clause (A).20250HB1310PN1432 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1310PN1432 - 3 - 12